North Dakota, session 69, SB2316.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 50-06 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Long-term care services for patients with ventilator or psychiatric needs.
1. The department shall establish four service regions in the state for the purpose of
providing long-term care services to individuals with ventilator or psychiatric needs.
The department shall contract with a provider in each region to provide services.
2. If the department is unable to contract with an entity to provide services, the
department shall pay the costs of providing care at a certified long-term care facility in
another state.
3. The department may collaborate with neighboring states to ensure services are
available to patients.
4. A long-term care facility is eligible to receive additional funding equivalent to the
additional cost of care at an ou t - o f - state facility if the long-term care facility provides
documentation to the department that a patient receiving care at the facility has
ventilator or psychiatric care needs and was receiving services at an ou t - o f - state
facility in the previous year.
Page No. 1 25.0753.01000